Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-3429
Board; members; per diem; expenses.

Each member of the board shall receive as compensation not more than one hundred dollars per day for each day or substantial portion of a day spent traveling to and from and attending sessions of the board and its committees, authorized meetings of the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards, the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying, or their subdivisions or committees, or other business as authorized by the board. Each member of the board shall be reimbursed for all necessary and authorized expenses incident to the performance of his or her duties under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 29;

Laws 2011, LB45, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 26.
August 30, 2015